Idaho, session 2025, S1028.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 1-802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
1-802. FIRST DISTRICT -- NUMBER OF JUDGES -- RESIDENT CHAMBERS. (1)
The first judicial district shall consist of the counties of Boundary, Bon-
ner, Kootenai, Shoshone, and Benewah.
(2) The first judicial district shall have seven (7) eight (8) district
judges.
(3) Resident chambers of the district judges of the first judicial dis-
trict shall be established as follows:
(a) Two (2) resident chambers shall be established in Bonner County;
(b) Four (4) Five (5) resident chambers shall be established in Koote-
nai County; and
(c) One (1) resident chamber shall be established in Shoshone County.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.